Mississippi, session 2026, HB4157.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The right of suffrage is hereby fully and completely restored to Robert Gill of Greene County, Mississippi, who was disqualified as an elector as a result of his conviction for the crime of Theft by Taking a Motor Vehicle in George County, on January 26, 2015, for which he was sentenced to serve five (5) years under the supervision of the custody of the Mississippi Department of Corrections.  He was released on January 26, 2015.  On April 7, 2016, he was sentenced to serve five (5) years in the custody of the Mississippi Department of Corrections, with five (5) years probation to serve. He was released to parole on December 6, 2017.  He was discharged on April 9, 2019.  The Legislature is informed that he has since conducted himself as a law-abiding and honorable citizen in a good and lawful manner. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.